Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.381

Depositors' claims, processing by department.

In the event of a failure of a grain dealer or warehouse operator, the department may process the claims of depositors possessing written evidence of ownership disclosing a storage obligation or written evidence of a sale of commodities in the following manner:

(1) The department shall give notice and provide a reasonable time to depositors possessing written evidence of ownership disclosing a storage obligation or written evidence of sale of commodities to file their claims with the department.

(2) The department may investigate each claim and determine whether the claimant's commodities are under a storage obligation or whether a sale of the commodities has occurred. The department may, in writing, notify each claimant and the failed grain dealer or warehouse operator of the department's determination as to the status and amount of each claimant's claim. A claimant, failed warehouse operator, or grain dealer may request a hearing on the department's determination within twenty days of receipt of written notification, and a hearing shall be held in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

(3) The department may inspect and audit the failed warehouse operator to determine whether the warehouse operator has in his or her possession sufficient quantities of commodities to cover his or her storage obligations. In the event of a shortage, the department shall determine each depositor's pro rata share of available commodities and the deficiency shall be considered as a claim of the depositor. Each type of commodity shall be treated separately for the purpose of determining shortages.

(4) The department shall determine the amount, if any, due each claimant by the surety and make demand upon the bond in the manner set forth in this chapter.

[ 2011 c 336 s 627; 1983 c 305 s 51.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 305: See note following RCW 20.01.010.